Maryland, session 2026, HB1195.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
5–5A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Office” means the Office of Home Energy Programs.
5–5A–09.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “LOCAL ADMINISTERING AGENCY” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 7–306.2 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
(B) THE OFFICE SHALL ADMINISTER, DIRECTLY OR THROUGH LOCAL
ADMINISTERING AGENCIES, THE PROGRAMS AND ACTIVITIES NECESSARY TO
IMPLEMENT § 7–306.2(O) AND (P) OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 1195 3
(C) THE OFFICE OR A LOCAL ADMINISTERING AGENCY MAY RECEIVE
SUBSCRIBER ACQUISITION FEES AUTHORIZED BY THE PUBLIC SERVICE
COMMISSION UNDER § 7–306.2(O)(12) OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
(D) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE OFFICE SHALL REPORT
TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE IMPLEMENTATION OF § 7–306.2(O) AND (P) OF THE
PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR,
INCLUDING, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE:
(1) FOR EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY SERVICE TERRITORY:
(I) THE NUMBER OF HOUSEHOLDS SERVED UNDER § 7–306.2(O)
OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE; AND
(II) THE NUMBER OF HOUSEHOLDS SERVED UNDER § 7–306.2(P)
OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE;
(2) ESTIMATED BILL SAVINGS DELIVERED TO PARTICIPATING
HOUSEHOLDS; AND
(3) EXPENDITURES FUNDED BY SUBSCRIBER ACQUISITION FEES.
Article – Public Utilities
7–306.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Biomass” means “qualified biomass” as defined in § 7–701 of this title.
(3) “CAPACITY RESERVATION” MEANS A RESERVATION OF NET
ENERGY METERED GENERATING CAPACITY UNDER SUBSECTION (J) OF THIS
SECTION THAT COUNTS TOWARD THE STATEWIDE LIMIT UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF
THIS SECTION.
(4) “Closed conduit hydro” means a hydroelectric generating facility that:
(i) generates electricity within existing piping or limited adjacent
piping of a potable water supply system;
(ii) is owned or operated by a municipal corporation or public water
authority; and

HOUSE BILL 1195
(iii) is designed to produce less energy than is consumed to operate
the water supply system.
(5) “COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 7–306.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
[(4)] (6) “Eligible customer–generator” means a customer that owns and
operates, leases and operates, or contracts with a third party that owns and operates a
biomass, micro combined heat and power, solar, fuel cell, wind, or closed conduit hydro
electric generating facility that:
(i) is located on the customer’s premises or contiguous property;
(ii) is interconnected and operated in parallel with an electric
company’s transmission and distribution facilities; and
(iii) is intended primarily to offset all or part of the customer’s own
electricity requirements.
[(5)] (7) “Fuel cell” means an electric generating facility that:
(i) includes integrated power plant systems containing a stack,
tubular array, or other functionally similar configuration used to electrochemically convert
fuel to electric energy; and
(ii) may include:
1. an inverter and fuel processing system; and
2. other plant equipment to support the plant’s operation or
its energy conversion, including heat recovery equipment.
(8) “MATURE NET ENERGY METERING PROJECT” MEANS A PROPOSED
QUALIFIED SYSTEM THAT MEETS THE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR A CAPACITY
RESERVATION UNDER SUBSECTION (J) OF THIS SECTION.
[(6)] (9) “Micro combined heat and power” means the simultaneous or
sequential production of useful thermal energy and electrical or mechanical power not
exceeding 30 kilowatts.
[(7)] (10) “Net energy metering” means measurement of the difference
between the electricity that is supplied by an electric company and the electricity that is
generated by an eligible customer–generator and fed back to the electric grid over the
eligible customer–generator’s billing period.

HOUSE BILL 1195 5
[(8)] (11) “Net excess generation” means the amount of the electricity
generated by an eligible customer–generator that is in excess of the electricity consumed
by the eligible customer–generator and that results in a negative kilowatt–hour reading at
the end of the eligible customer–generator’s billing cycle.
(12) “QUALIFIED SYSTEM” MEANS:
(I) A BEHIND–THE–METER ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM
ASSOCIATED WITH AN ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER–GENERATOR UNDER THIS SECTION;
(II) AN ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM THAT ENGAGES IN METER
AGGREGATION UNDER § 7–306.3 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(III) A COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM.
(13) “STANDARD UTILITY NET–EXPORT RATE FOR INTEGRATED
SOLAR AND ENERGY PROGRAM” OR “SUNRISE PROGRAM” MEANS A
COMPENSATION PROGRAM ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER SUBSECTION (L)
OF THIS SECTION AS A SUCCESSOR PROGRAM TO THE NET ENERGY METERING
PROGRAM UNDER SUBSECTIONS (D) THROUGH (F) OF THIS SECTION.
(14) “SUBSCRIBER ORGANIZATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
7–306.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(b) The General Assembly finds and declares that a program to provide net energy
metering for eligible customer–generators is a means to encourage private investment in
renewable energy resources, stimulate in–State economic growth, enhance continued
diversification of the State’s energy resource mix, and reduce costs of interconnection and
administration.
(c) An electric company serving an eligible customer–generator shall ensure that
the meter installed for net energy metering is capable of measuring the flow of electricity
in two directions.
(d) (1) The Commission shall require electric utilities to develop a standard
contract or tariff for net energy metering and make it available to eligible
customer–generators on a first–come, first–served basis until the rated generating capacity
[owned and operated by eligible customer–generators in the State] COUNTED TOWARD
THE STATEWIDE LIMIT UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION reaches 3,000
megawatts OF ALTERNATING CURRENT.
(2) RATED GENERATING CAPACITY SHALL BE COUNTED TOWARD THE
3,000 MEGAWATT ALTERNATING CURRENT STATEWIDE LIMIT AS THE SUM OF:

HOUSE BILL 1195
(I) QUALIFIED SYSTEMS OPERATING IN THE STATE ON OR
BEFORE JULY 1, 2027; AND
(II) RESERVED CAPACITY ASSOCIATED WITH CAPACITY
RESERVATIONS FOR MATURE NET ENERGY METERING PROJECTS UNDER
SUBSECTION (J) OF THIS SECTION.
(e) (1) A net energy metering OR SUNRISE PROGRAM contract or tariff
shall be identical, in energy rates, rate structure, and monthly charges, to the contract or
tariff that the customer would be assigned if the customer were not an eligible
customer–generator.
(2) (i) A net energy metering OR SUNRISE PROGRAM contract or
tariff may not include charges that would raise the eligible customer–generator’s minimum
monthly charge above that of customers of the rate class to which the eligible
customer–generator would otherwise be assigned.
(ii) Charges prohibited by this paragraph include new or additional
demand charges, standby charges, customer charges, and minimum monthly charges.
(f) (1) The electric company shall calculate net energy metering in accordance
with this subsection.
(2) Net energy produced or consumed on a regular basis shall be measured
in accordance with standard metering practices.
(3) If electricity supplied by the grid exceeds electricity generated by the
eligible customer–generator during a month, the eligible customer–generator shall be billed
for the net energy supplied in accordance with subsection (e) of this section.
(4) If electricity generated by the eligible customer–generator exceeds the
electricity supplied by the grid, the eligible customer–generator shall be billed only
customer charges for that month in accordance with subsection (e) of this section.
(5) (i) An eligible customer–generator under paragraph (4) of this
subsection may:
1. accrue net excess generation for a period:
A. not to exceed 12 months; and
B. that ends with the billing cycle that is complete
immediately prior to the end of April of each year; or
2. except for an eligible customer–generator served by a
municipal electric utility or an electric cooperative and subject to subparagraph (iv) of this

HOUSE BILL 1195 7
paragraph, accrue net excess generation for an indefinite period regardless of whether the
eligible customer–generator previously accrued net excess generation for a period
authorized under item 1 of this subparagraph.
(ii) The electric company shall carry forward net excess generation
until:
1. the eligible customer–generator’s consumption of
electricity from the grid eliminates the net excess generation;
2. the accrual period under subparagraph (i)1 of this
paragraph expires; or
3. the account is closed.
(iii) 1. If an eligible customer–generator elects to accrue net
excess generation for a period not to exceed 12 months under subparagraph (i)1 of this
paragraph, the dollar value of net excess generation shall be equal to the generation or
commodity portion of the rate that the eligible customer–generator would have been
charged by the electric company averaged over the previous 12–month period ending with
the billing cycle that is complete immediately before the end of April multiplied by the
number of kilowatt–hours of net excess generation.
2. For an eligible customer–generator that elects to accrue
net excess generation under subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph and is served by a
community choice aggregator or an electricity supplier, the dollar value of the net excess
generation shall be equal to the generation or commodity rate that the customer would
have been charged by the community choice aggregator or electricity supplier multiplied
by the number of kilowatt–hours of net excess generation.
(iv) If an eligible customer–generator elects to accrue net excess
generation for an indefinite period under subparagraph (i)2 of this paragraph:
1. the eligible customer–generator may not elect to switch to
accruing net excess generation under subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph unless the
electric company approves the switch; and
2. the electric company shall, within 15 days after an eligible
customer–generator’s account is closed, pay the eligible customer–generator, in accordance
with subparagraph (v) of this paragraph, for any accrued net excess generation remaining
at the time the account is closed.
(v) The Commission shall establish a method for calculating the
value of any accrued net excess generation that a customer–generator elects to accrue for
an indefinite period under subparagraph (i)2 of this paragraph.

HOUSE BILL 1195
(6) (i) If an eligible customer–generator elects to accrue net excess
generation under paragraph (5)(i)1 of this subsection, on or before 30 days after the billing
cycle that is complete immediately prior to the end of April of each year, the electric
company shall pay the eligible customer–generator for the dollar value of any accrued net
excess generation remaining at the end of the previous 12–month period ending with the
billing cycle that is complete immediately before the end of April.
(ii) Within 15 days after the date an eligible customer–generator
that elects to accrue net excess generation under paragraph (5)(i)1 of this subsection closes
the eligible customer–generator’s account, the electric company shall pay the eligible
customer–generator for the dollar value of any accrued net excess generation remaining at
the time the eligible customer–generator closes the account.
(7) (i) Notwithstanding paragraphs (5) and (6) of this subsection, an
eligible customer–generator served by an electric cooperative that serves a population of
less than 250,000 in its distribution territory may choose to be paid for the dollar value of
net excess generation remaining at the end of each month instead of at the end of the
accrual period specified under paragraph (5)(i)1 of this subsection.
(ii) If an eligible customer–generator chooses to be paid for the dollar
value of net excess generation remaining at the end of each month:
1. the customer–generator may accrue net excess generation
on a monthly basis;
2. the dollar value of the net excess generation shall be equal
to the generation or commodity portion of the rate that the eligible customer–generator
would have been charged by the electric company for the previous month; and
3. on or before 30 days after the end of each month, the
electric cooperative shall pay the eligible customer–generator for the dollar value of net
excess generation remaining at the end of the previous month.
(g) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (6), (7), and (8) of this subsection, the
generating capacity of an electric generating system used by an eligible
customer–generator for net ENERGY metering may not exceed 2 megawatts.
(2) An electric generating system used by an eligible customer–generator
for net ENERGY metering shall meet all applicable safety and performance standards
established by the National Electrical Code, the Institute of Electrical and Electronics
Engineers, and Underwriters Laboratories.
(3) The Commission may adopt by regulation additional control and testing
requirements for eligible customer–generators that the Commission determines are
necessary to protect public safety and system reliability.

HOUSE BILL 1195 9
(4) An electric company may not require an eligible customer–generator
whose electric generating system meets the standards of paragraphs (2) and (3) of this
subsection to:
(i) install additional controls;
(ii) perform or pay for additional tests; or
(iii) purchase additional liability insurance.
(5) An eligible customer–generator or the eligible customer–generator’s
assignee shall own and have title to all renewable energy attributes or renewable energy
credits associated with any electricity produced by its electric generating system.
(6) The Commission may not prohibit the construction or operation of
multiple [net metered] solar energy generating facilities located on separate contiguous
lots that are owned by a local government solely because the capacity of the combined [net
metering] systems exceeds the limit established under paragraph (1) of this subsection, if:
(i) the [net metered] solar energy generating facilities are intended
to be used solely for the benefit of the local government;
(ii) the total capacity of the [net metered] solar energy generating
facilities on the contiguous lots does not exceed 5 megawatts OF ALTERNATING CURRENT;
(iii) the contiguous lots were not subdivided for the purpose of
circumventing the limit established under paragraph (1) of this subsection; and
(iv) the utility serving the [net metered] solar energy generating
facilities is not an electric cooperative or municipal electric utility.
(7) The generating capacity of a community solar energy generating system
established under § 7–306.2 of this subtitle that is used for net ENERGY metering OR THE
SUNRISE PROGRAM may not exceed 5 megawatts OF ALTERNATING CURRENT.
(8) The generating capacity of a [net metered] facility that is meter
aggregated under § 7–306.3 of this subtitle may not exceed 5 megawatts OF ALTERNATING
CURRENT.
(h) An eligible customer–generator participating in net energy metering may
participate in the aggregation activities of a community choice aggregator under § 7–510.3
of this title.
(i) Notwithstanding the generating capacity limits established in subsection (g)
of this section, an eligible customer–generator participating in meter aggregation under §
7–306.2 or § 7–306.3 of this subtitle may receive excess generation from more than one

HOUSE BILL 1195
generating system, including if the combined generating capacity of all [net metered]
facilities that are meter aggregated exceeds 5 megawatts OF ALTERNATING CURRENT.
(J) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE COMMISSION SHALL
ESTABLISH, BY ORDER OR REGULATION, A STANDARDIZED STATEWIDE CAPACITY
RESERVATION SYSTEM FOR MATURE NET ENERGY METERING PROJECTS THAT ARE
NOT YET OPERATIONAL.
(2) WHEN THE RESERVATION SYSTEM REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS ESTABLISHED, AN ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL
AUTOMATICALLY ACCEPT A CAPACITY RESERVATION FOR A QUALIFIED SYSTEM
THAT IS NOT OPERATIONAL BUT HAS MET THE FOLLOWING REQUIREMENTS:
(I) FOR A BEHIND–THE–METER SYSTEM, THE DEVELOPER OF
THE SYSTEM OR THE ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER–GENERATOR HAS:
1. SUBMITTED A COMPLETE INTERCONNECTION
APPLICATION, AS DETERMINED BY THE ELECTRIC COMPANY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THE COMMISSION’S SMALL GENERATOR INTERCONNECTIONS STANDARDS; AND
2. PAID TO THE ELECTRIC COMPANY ANY REQUIRED
INTERCONNECTION APPLICATION FEES;
(II) FOR A SYSTEM THAT WILL ENGAGE IN METER AGGREGATION
UNDER § 7–306.3 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE DEVELOPER OF THE SYSTEM OR ELIGIBLE
CUSTOMER–GENERATOR HAS:
1. RETURNED TO THE ELECTRIC COMPANY AN
EXECUTED INTERCONNECTION AGREEMENT SIGNED BY THE DEVELOPER OR
ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER–GENERATOR;
2. PAID THE INITIAL DEPOSIT REQUIRED UNDER THE
INTERCONNECTION AGREEMENT;
3. PROVIDED THE ELECTRIC COMPANY PROOF OF SITE
CONTROL; AND
4. PROVIDED THE ELECTRIC COMPANY WITH EVIDENCE
OF ONE OF THE FOLLOWING:
A. AN APPLICATION FOR AT LEAST ONE REQUIRED
PERMIT IF THE SYSTEM IS EXEMPT FROM THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 7–207 OR §
7–207.4 OF THIS TITLE;

HOUSE BILL 1195 11
B. RECEIPT OF A DETERMINATION FROM A PUBLIC
UTILITY LAW JUDGE OR THE COMMISSION THAT AN APPLICATION FOR A
CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER § 7–207 OF THIS
TITLE IS COMPLETE; OR
C. RECEIPT OF ACHIEVEMENT OF A MILESTONE
ASSOCIATED WITH AN APPLICATION FOR A DISTRIBUTED GENERATION CERTIFICATE
OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER § 7–207.4 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(III) FOR A COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM,
THE DEVELOPER OF THE SYSTEM HAS:
1. RETURNED TO THE ELECTRIC COMPANY AN
EXECUTED INTERCONNECTION AGREEMENT SIGNED BY THE DEVELOPER;
2. PAID THE INITIAL DEPOSIT REQUIRED UNDER THE
INTERCONNECTION AGREEMENT;
3. PROVIDED THE ELECTRIC COMPANY PROOF OF SITE
CONTROL;
4. PROVIDED THE ELECTRIC COMPANY WITH EVIDENCE
OF ONE OF THE FOLLOWING:
A. AN APPLICATION FOR AT LEAST ONE REQUIRED
PERMIT IF THE SYSTEM IS EXEMPT FROM THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 7–207 OR §
7–207.4 OF THIS TITLE;
B. RECEIPT OF A DETERMINATION FROM A PUBLIC
UTILITY LAW JUDGE OR THE COMMISSION THAT AN APPLICATION FOR A
CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER § 7–207 OF THIS
TITLE IS COMPLETE; OR
C. RECEIPT OF ACHIEVEMENT OF A MILESTONE
ASSOCIATED WITH AN APPLICATION FOR A DISTRIBUTED GENERATION CERTIFICATE
OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER § 7–207.4 OF THIS TITLE; AND
5. SUBMITTED TO THE ELECTRIC COMPANY THE
SUBSCRIBER ORGANIZATION NUMBER ASSOCIATED WITH THE LOCATION OF THE
PROPOSED SYSTEM AS EVIDENCE OF THE COMMISSION’S AUTHORIZATION FOR THE
SYSTEM TO PARTICIPATE IN THE COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM
PROGRAM.

HOUSE BILL 1195
(3) (I) IF AN ELECTRIC COMPANY HAS NOT ISSUED AN
INTERCONNECTION AGREEMENT OR DEPOSIT INVOICE FOR A QUALIFIED SYSTEM
WITHIN THE TIME FRAME ESTABLISHED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER THIS SECTION,
THE DEVELOPER OF THE QUALIFIED SYSTEM MAY, IN LIEU OF THE REQUIREMENTS
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(II) AND (III) OF THIS SUBSECTION, PAY TO THE ELECTRIC
COMPANY A REFUNDABLE CASH DEPOSIT OF $25 PER KILOWATT OF ALTERNATING
CURRENT GENERATION CAPACITY.
(II) A QUALIFIED SYSTEM FOR WHICH A CASH DEPOSIT HAS
BEEN PAID UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL AUTOMATICALLY
RECEIVE A CAPACITY RESERVATION FROM THE ELECTRIC COMPANY ON
COMPLETION OF MEETING THE REQUIREMENTS IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(III) AN ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL:
1. ON REQUEST BY THE DEVELOPER OF A QUALIFIED
SYSTEM, REFUND A DEPOSIT PAID UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH; AND
2. RETAIN THE RESERVED CAPACITY FOR THE
QUALIFIED SYSTEM ONLY IF, WHEN THE DEVELOPER OF THE QUALIFIED SYSTEM
HAS REQUESTED A REFUND, THE DEVELOPER HAS SATISFIED:
A. ALL THE REQUIREMENTS IN PARAGRAPH (2)(II) OF
THIS SUBSECTION IF THE QUALIFIED SYSTEM WILL BE USED IN METER
AGGREGATION UNDER § 7–306.3 OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
B. ALL THE REQUIREMENTS IN PARAGRAPH (2)(III) OF
THIS SUBSECTION IF THE QUALIFIED SYSTEM IS A COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATING SYSTEM.
(4) AN ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL NOTIFY THE DEVELOPER OF A
QUALIFIED SYSTEM AND THE COMMISSION WHEN THE QUALIFIED SYSTEM HAS
RECEIVED A CAPACITY RESERVATION.
(5) RESERVED CAPACITY ASSOCIATED WITH A CAPACITY
RESERVATION SHALL COUNT TOWARD THE STATEWIDE LIMIT UNDER SUBSECTION
(D)(2) OF THIS SECTION AS OF THE DATE AND TIME THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OR (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION ARE SATISFIED, INCLUDING QUALIFIED
SYSTEMS THAT SATISFIED THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OR (3) OF
THIS SUBSECTION BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, BUT WERE NOT YET OPERATIONAL ON
THAT DATE.

HOUSE BILL 1195 13
(6) A CAPACITY RESERVATION SHALL BE CALCULATED AS:
(I) FOR A QUALIFIED SYSTEM THAT IS A BEHIND–THE–METER
SYSTEM ASSOCIATED WITH AN ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER–GENERATOR UNDER THIS
SECTION, THE ALTERNATING CURRENT GENERATING CAPACITY OF THE SYSTEM AS
CONTAINED IN THE INTERCONNECTION APPLICATION CONSIDERED COMPLETE BY
THE ELECTRIC COMPANY;
(II) FOR A QUALIFIED SYSTEM THAT WILL ENGAGE IN METER
AGGREGATION UNDER § 7–306.3 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE ALTERNATING CURRENT
GENERATING CAPACITY OF THE SYSTEM AS CONTAINED IN THE INTERCONNECTION
AGREEMENT EXECUTED BY THE DEVELOPER OF THE SYSTEM OR ELIGIBLE
CUSTOMER–GENERATOR; AND
(III) FOR A QUALIFIED SYSTEM THAT IS A COMMUNITY SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM, THE ALTERNATING CURRENT GENERATING
CAPACITY OF THE SYSTEM AS CONTAINED IN THE INTERCONNECTION AGREEMENT
EXECUTED BY THE DEVELOPER OF THE SYSTEM OR SUBSCRIBER ORGANIZATION.
(7) ON OR BEFORE APRIL 1, 2027, THE COMMISSION SHALL
ESTABLISH, BY ORDER OR REGULATION:
(I) A METHOD FOR ELECTRIC COMPANIES JOINTLY TO TRACK
AND AGGREGATE CAPACITY RESERVATIONS AND OPERATIONAL QUALIFIED
SYSTEMS TO COUNT PROGRESS TOWARD REACHING THE STATEWIDE CAP UNDER
SUBSECTION (D)(1) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) CONDITIONS UNDER WHICH A CAPACITY RESERVATION MAY
BE MODIFIED, WITHDRAWN, OR CANCELED, AND THE EFFECT OF THAT ACTION ON
CAPACITY ACCOUNTING UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION;
(III) WHETHER AND UNDER WHAT CONDITIONS A CAPACITY
RESERVATION MAY BE ASSIGNED OR TRANSFERRED, INCLUDING PROTECTIONS TO
PRESERVE THE FIRST–COME, FIRST–SERVED CHARACTER OF THE PROGRAM;
(IV) A WAITLIST FOR QUALIFIED SYSTEMS THAT MAY RECEIVE
CAPACITY IF PRECEDING PROJECTS ARE WITHDRAWN OR CANCELED OR HAVE A
REDUCTION IN GENERATING CAPACITY;
(V) A UNIFORM DEADLINE BY WHICH AN ELECTRIC COMPANY
SHALL PROVIDE THE DEVELOPER OF A QUALIFIED SYSTEM WITH AN

HOUSE BILL 1195
INTERCONNECTION AGREEMENT AFTER THE DEVELOPER SUBMITS AN
INTERCONNECTION APPLICATION TO THE ELECTRIC COMPANY; AND
(VI) UNIFORM STANDARDS FOR INTERCONNECTION UPGRADE
DEPOSITS, INCLUDING:
1. THE AMOUNT OF DEPOSIT REQUIRED; AND
2. DEADLINES BY WHICH AN ELECTRIC COMPANY MUST
DELIVER AN INVOICE AND WHEN DEPOSIT PAYMENTS ARE DUE.
(K) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, AND AT LEAST ONCE A MONTH
THEREAFTER, THE COMMISSION SHALL MAINTAIN AND PUBLISH OR REQUIRE
ELECTRIC COMPANIES JOINTLY TO MAINTAIN AND PUBLISH A STATEWIDE NET
ENERGY METERING CAPACITY TRACKER THAT, AT A MINIMUM, IDENTIFIES:
(1) THE TOTAL STATEWIDE NAMEPLATE GENERATING CAPACITY OF
OPERATIONAL PROJECTS ENGAGING IN NET ENERGY METERING;
(2) THE REMAINING CAPACITY AVAILABLE BEFORE THE STATEWIDE
LIMIT UNDER SUBSECTION (D) IS REACHED; AND
(3) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027:
(I) RESERVED CAPACITY COUNTED TOWARD THE STATEWIDE
LIMIT UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) A LIST OF QUALIFIED SYSTEMS WITH RESERVED CAPACITY,
INCLUDING THE ORDER IN WHICH EACH QUALIFIED SYSTEM OBTAINED RESERVED
CAPACITY AND ANY DEADLINES BY WHICH THE QUALIFIED SYSTEM MUST BECOME
OPERATIONAL.
(L) (1) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, THE COMMISSION SHALL
INITIATE A PUBLIC PROCEEDING AND STAKEHOLDER PROCESS TO DEVELOP THE
SUNRISE PROGRAM FOR A DELIVERY DATE OF JULY 1, 2027.
(2) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE COMMISSION, BY REGULATION
OR ORDER, SHALL ADOPT A SUNRISE PROGRAM THAT:
(I) ESTABLISHES A MECHANISM FOR COMPENSATION OF
ELECTRICITY EXPORTED TO THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM BY QUALIFIED
SYSTEMS;

HOUSE BILL 1195 15
(II) INCLUDES IN ELECTRIC COMPANY TARIFFS FOR QUALIFIED
SYSTEMS COMPENSATION FOR EXPORTED ELECTRICITY THAT, AT A MINIMUM,
PROVIDES:
1. BASELINE COMPENSATION EQUAL TO THE STANDARD
OFFER SERVICE RATES OF THE ELECTRIC COMPANY, INCLUDING THE ENERGY
VALUE, CAPACITY VALUE, AND TRANSMISSION VALUE;
2. DEMAND REDUCTION–INDUCED PRICE EFFECTS ON
ENERGY AND CAPACITY PRICES AND CROSS–MARKET PRICE REDUCTIONS;
3. AVOIDED DISTRIBUTION COSTS;
4. AVOIDED ANCILLARY SERVICES AND VOLTAGE
STABILIZATION COSTS;
5. RELIABILITY BENEFITS;
6. NONEMBEDDED EMISSIONS; AND
7. ANY OTHER CATEGORY OF BENEFITS APPROVED BY
THE COMMISSION; AND
(III) ACCOUNTS FOR NET EXCESS GENERATION IN THE SAME
MANNER AS REQUIRED FOR A NET ENERGY METERED FACILITY UNDER SUBSECTION
(F) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) IN ESTABLISHING THE COMPENSATION VALUE UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2)(II)1 OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION MAY ESTABLISH
DIFFERENTIATED VALUES BASED ON FACTORS THE COMMISSION FINDS
REASONABLY RELATED TO ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM VALUE AND
LOCATIONS, INCLUDING TIME OF GENERATION AND WHETHER THE QUALIFIED
SYSTEM INCLUDES CO–LOCATED ENERGY STORAGE.
(4) EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL IMPLEMENT THE SUNRISE
PROGRAM THROUGH THE FOLLOWING TARIFFS THAT MUST BE APPROVED BY THE
COMMISSION:
(I) AN UPDATED COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING
SYSTEM TARIFF UNDER § 7–306.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE THAT INCORPORATES THE
SUNRISE PROGRAM COMPENSATION METHODOLOGY; AND
(II) A NEW TARIFF AVAILABLE TO:

HOUSE BILL 1195
1. BEHIND–THE–METER QUALIFIED SYSTEMS
ASSOCIATED WITH AN ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER–GENERATOR UNDER THIS SECTION;
2. COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS
UNDER § 7–306.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
3. SYSTEMS THAT ENGAGE IN METER AGGREGATION
UNDER § 7–306.3 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(M) (1) IF THE STATEWIDE LIMIT UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION IS NOT REACHED WHEN THE SUNRISE PROGRAM BECOMES AVAILABLE
UNDER SUBSECTION (L) OF THIS SECTION, A QUALIFIED SYSTEM THAT WOULD
OTHERWISE QUALIFY TO PARTICIPATE IN NET ENERGY METERING ON OR AFTER
JULY 1, 2027, MAY ELECT TO PARTICIPATE IN EITHER:
(I) THE NET ENERGY METERING PROGRAM UNDER
SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION; OR
(II) THE SUNRISE PROGRAM UNDER SUBSECTION (L) OF THIS
SECTION.
(2) WHEN THE STATEWIDE LIMIT UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION IS REACHED:
(I) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROHIBIT ELECTRIC COMPANIES
FROM ACCEPTING CAPACITY RESERVATIONS FROM QUALIFIED SYSTEMS THAT DID
NOT HOLD A CAPACITY RESERVATION WHEN THE STATEWIDE LIMIT WAS REACHED;
AND
(II) THE SUNRISE PROGRAM SHALL REMAIN AVAILABLE TO
QUALIFIED SYSTEMS THAT DID NOT HOLD A CAPACITY RESERVATION WHEN THE
STATEWIDE LIMIT WAS REACHED.
[(j)] (N) On or before November 1 of each year, the Commission shall report to
the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on the
status of the net ENERGY metering program OR THE SUNRISE PROGRAM under this
section, including:
(1) the amount of capacity of electric generating facilities owned and
operated by eligible customer–generators in the State by type of energy resource;

HOUSE BILL 1195 17
(2) based on the need to encourage a diversification of the State’s energy
resource mix to ensure reliability, whether the rated generating capacity limit in subsection
(d) of this section should be altered; [and]
(3) THE AMOUNT OF RATED GENERATING CAPACITY COUNTED
TOWARD THE STATEWIDE LIMIT UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(2) OF THIS SECTION;
(4) IF APPLICABLE, THE STATUS OF THE COMMISSION’S PROCEEDING
AND STAKEHOLDER PROCESS TO ESTABLISH THE SUNRISE PROGRAM UNDER
SUBSECTION (L) OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDING KEY DATES, FILINGS, AND ACTIONS
TAKEN DURING THE PRECEDING YEAR; AND
[(3)] (5) other pertinent information.
7–306.2.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Agrivoltaics” means the simultaneous use of areas of land:
1. that are maintained in agricultural use in accordance with
COMAR 18.02.03 or the Maryland Assessment Procedures Manual; and
2. for both solar power generation and:
A. raising grains, fruits, herbs, melons, mushrooms, nuts,
seeds, tobacco, or vegetables;
B. raising poultry, including chickens and turkeys, for meat
or egg production;
C. dairy production, such as the raising of milking cows;
D. raising livestock, including cattle, sheep, goats, or pigs;
E. horse boarding, breeding, or training;
F. turf farming;
G. raising ornamental shrubs, plants, or flowers, including
aquatic plants;
H. aquaculture;
I. silviculture; or

HOUSE BILL 1195
J. any other activity recognized as an agricultural activity
under COMAR 18.02.03 or the Maryland Assessment Procedures Manual.
(ii) “Agrivoltaics” does not include the simultaneous use of areas of
land for both solar power generation and:
1. apiaries; or
2. pollinator habitat.
(3) “Baseline annual usage” means:
(i) a subscriber’s accumulated electricity use in kilowatt–hours for
the 12 months before the subscriber’s most recent subscription; or
(ii) for a subscriber that does not have a record of 12 months of
electricity use at the time of the subscriber’s most recent subscription, an estimate of the
subscriber’s accumulated 12 months of electricity use in kilowatt–hours, determined in a
manner the Commission approves.
(4) “Community solar energy generating system” means a solar energy
system that:
(i) is connected to the electric distribution system serving the State;
(ii) is located in the same electric service territory as its subscribers;
(iii) is attached to the electric meter of a subscriber or is a separate
facility with its own electric meter;
(iv) credits its generated electricity, or the value of its generated
electricity, to the bills of the subscribers to that system through virtual net energy
metering;
(v) has at least two subscribers but no limit to the maximum number
of subscribers;
(vi) does not have subscriptions larger than 200 kilowatts
constituting more than 60% of its kilowatt–hour output;
(vii) has a generating capacity that does not exceed 5 megawatts as
measured by the alternating current rating of the system’s inverter;
(viii) may be owned by any person; and
(ix) with respect to community solar energy generating systems
constructed under the Program, [serves at least 40% of its kilowatt–hour output to LMI

HOUSE BILL 1195 19
subscribers] unless the solar energy system is wholly owned by the subscribers to the solar
energy system, EITHER:
1. SERVES AT LEAST 40% OF ITS KILOWATT–HOUR
OUTPUT TO LMI SUBSCRIBERS:
A. THROUGH A SUBSCRIBER ORGANIZATION OR
SUBSCRIPTION COORDINATOR; OR
B. BY ENROLLMENT FACILITATED BY THE OFFICE OF
HOME ENERGY PROGRAMS OR A LOCAL ADMINISTERING AGENCY UNDER
SUBSECTION (O) OF THIS SECTION; OR
2. DEDICATES OUTPUT IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (P) OF THIS SECTION.
(5) “Consolidated billing” means a payment mechanism that requires an
electric company to, at the request of a subscriber organization or subscription coordinator:
(i) include the monthly subscription charge of a subscriber
organization or subscription coordinator on the monthly bills rendered by the electric
company for electric service and supply to subscribers; and
(ii) remit payment for those charges to the subscriber organization
or subscription coordinator.
(6) “Critical area” has the meaning stated in § 8–1802 of the Natural
Resources Article.
(7) “DESIGNATED LMI CUSTOMER” MEANS AN ELIGIBLE
HOUSEHOLD THAT IS:
(I) ENROLLED IN THE PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (O) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) 1. LOW–INCOME;
2. MODERATE–INCOME; OR
3. LOCATED IN A CENSUS TRACT THAT IS:
A. AN OVERBURDENED COMMUNITY; AND
B. AN UNDERSERVED COMMUNITY.

HOUSE BILL 1195
(8) “ELIGIBLE HOUSEHOLD” MEANS A RESIDENTIAL ELECTRIC
CUSTOMER THAT THE OFFICE OF HOME ENERGY PROGRAMS, A LOCAL
ADMINISTERING AGENCY, A SUBSCRIPTION COORDINATOR, OR A SUBSCRIBER
ORGANIZATION DETERMINES MEETS THE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS UNDER
SUBSECTIONS (O) OR (P) OF THIS SECTION.
[(7)] (9) “LMI subscriber” means a subscriber that:
(i) is low–income;
(ii) is moderate–income; or
(iii) resides in a census tract that is:
1. an overburdened community; and
2. an underserved community.
(10) “LOCAL ADMINISTERING AGENCY” MEANS A LOCAL ENTITY THAT
ADMINISTERS OR ASSISTS IN THE ADMINISTERING OF PROGRAMS OF THE OFFICE OF
HOME ENERGY PROGRAMS, AS DESIGNATED BY THE OFFICE.
[(8)] (11) “Low–income” means:
(i) having an annual household income that is at or below 200% of
the federal poverty level; or
(ii) being certified as eligible for any federal, State, or local
assistance program that limits participation to households whose income is at or below
200% of the federal poverty level.
[(9)] (12) “Moderate–income” means having an annual household income
that is at or below 80% of the median income for Maryland.
(13) “OFFICE OF HOME ENERGY PROGRAMS” OR “OFFICE” MEANS
THE OFFICE OF HOME ENERGY PROGRAMS ESTABLISHED UNDER §
5–5A–09.1 OF THE HUMAN SERVICES ARTICLE.
[(10)] (14) “Overburdened community” has the meaning stated in § 1–701
of the Environment Article.
[(11)] (15) “Pilot program” means the program established under this
section before July 1, 2023, and effective until the start of the Program established under
subsection (d)(20) of this section.

HOUSE BILL 1195 21
[(12)] (16) “Program” means the Community Solar Energy Generating
Systems Program.
[(13)] (17) “Queue” means:
(i) the pilot program queue an electric company is required to
maintain under COMAR 20.62.03.04; and
(ii) a queue an electric company may be required to maintain under
the Program.
[(14)] (18) “Subscriber” means a retail customer of an electric company that:
(i) holds a subscription to a community solar energy generating
system; and
(ii) has identified one or more individual meters or accounts to which
the subscription shall be attributed.
[(15)] (19) “Subscriber organization” means:
(i) a person that owns or operates a community solar energy
generating system; or
(ii) the collective group of subscribers of a community solar energy
generating system.
[(16)] (20) “Subscription” means the portion of the electricity generated by
a community solar energy generating system that is credited to a subscriber.
[(17)] (21) “Subscription coordinator” means a person that:
(i) markets community solar energy generating systems or
otherwise provides services related to community solar energy generating systems under
its own brand name;
(ii) performs any administrative action to allocate subscriptions,
connect subscribers with community solar energy generating systems, or enroll customers
in the Program; or
(iii) manages interactions between a subscriber organization and an
electric company or electricity supplier relating to subscribers.
[(18)] (22) “Underserved community” has the meaning stated in § 1–701 of
the Environment Article.

HOUSE BILL 1195
[(19)] (23) “Unsubscribed energy” means any community solar energy
generating system output in kilowatt–hours that is not allocated to any subscriber.
[(20)] (24) “Virtual net energy metering” means measurement of the
difference between the kilowatt–hours or value of electricity that is supplied by an electric
company and the kilowatt–hours or value of electricity attributable to a subscription to a
community solar energy generating system and fed back to the electric grid over the
subscriber’s billing period, as calculated under the tariffs established under subsections
(e)(2), (f)(2), and (g)(2) of this section.
(O) (1) (I) A COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM MAY
SATISFY ALL OR PART OF THE LMI SUBSCRIBER PARTICIPATION REQUIREMENT
UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(4)(IX)1 OF THIS SECTION THROUGH ENROLLMENT OF
ELIGIBLE HOUSEHOLDS IN THE PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) ENROLLMENT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL BE FACILITATED BY THE OFFICE OR A LOCAL ADMINISTERING
AGENCY.
(2) THE OFFICE OR A LOCAL ADMINISTERING AGENCY SHALL
DESIGNATE ONE OR MORE SUBSCRIPTION COORDINATORS OR SUBSCRIBER
ORGANIZATIONS PER COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM TO
SUPPORT ENROLLMENT, COMMUNICATIONS, AND ONGOING SUBSCRIPTION
MANAGEMENT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) THE OFFICE OR A LOCAL ADMINISTERING AGENCY SHALL
IDENTIFY, BY ELECTRIC COMPANY SERVICE TERRITORY, ELIGIBLE HOUSEHOLDS
FOR ENROLLMENT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(4) THE OFFICE OR A LOCAL ADMINISTERING AGENCY MAY
PRIORITIZE ELIGIBLE HOUSEHOLDS FOR ENROLLMENT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
BASED ON HOUSEHOLD NEED, INCLUDING PRIORITIZING BY:
(I) BENEFIT LEVEL, PRIORITY TIERS, OR SIMILAR NEED–BASED
CATEGORIZATION BY THE OFFICE; OR
(II) DURATION OF PARTICIPATION IN ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS
ADMINISTERED BY THE OFFICE.
(5) THE OFFICE OR A LOCAL ADMINISTERING AGENCY MAY:

HOUSE BILL 1195 23
(I) INITIALLY LIMIT ENROLLMENT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
TO ELIGIBLE HOUSEHOLDS PARTICIPATING IN ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS
ADMINISTERED BY THE OFFICE; OR
(II) EXPAND ELIGIBILITY TO ADDITIONAL CATEGORIES OF
INCOME–QUALIFIED CUSTOMERS, INCLUDING HOUSEHOLDS PARTICIPATING IN
OTHER MEANS–TESTED PUBLIC BENEFIT PROGRAMS, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
GUIDELINES ISSUED BY THE OFFICE.
(6) BEFORE ENROLLMENT, THE OFFICE, A LOCAL ADMINISTERING
AGENCY, A SUBSCRIPTION COORDINATOR, OR A SUBSCRIBER ORGANIZATION
DESIGNATED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL SEND AN
OPT–OUT NOTICE TO EACH ELIGIBLE HOUSEHOLD SELECTED FOR ENROLLMENT
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION THAT:
(I) STATES THAT THE HOUSEHOLD WILL RECEIVE COMMUNITY
SOLAR BILL CREDITS THAT REDUCE THE HOUSEHOLD’S ELECTRIC BILL;
(II) DESCRIBES THE DISCOUNT AND KEY TERMS REQUIRED
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(III) PROVIDES A CLEAR METHOD FOR OPTING OUT.
(7) IF AN ELIGIBLE HOUSEHOLD DOES NOT OPT OUT WITHIN 45 DAYS
OF TRANSMITTAL OF THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (6) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE SUBSCRIPTION COORDINATOR OR SUBSCRIBER ORGANIZATION
DESIGNATED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY REQUEST THAT THE
ELECTRIC COMPANY ENROLL THE HOUSEHOLD AS A DESIGNATED LMI CUSTOMER
UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(8) AN ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL APPLY BILL CREDITS UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH COMMISSION–APPROVED TARIFFS AT THE
DIRECTION OF THE SUBSCRIPTION COORDINATOR OR SUBSCRIBER ORGANIZATION
DESIGNATED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(9) A DESIGNATED LMI CUSTOMER SHALL RECEIVE GUARANTEED
ELECTRIC BILL SAVINGS OF 20% OF THE VALUE OF THE BILL CREDITS APPLIED TO
THE LMI CUSTOMER.
(10) AN ENROLLMENT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT INCLUDE:
(I) AN ENROLLMENT FEE; OR

HOUSE BILL 1195
(II) A TERMINATION FEE.
(11) AN ELIGIBLE HOUSEHOLD MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO EXECUTE A
SUBSCRIBER AGREEMENT OR CONTRACT DISCLOSURE FORM FOR AN ENROLLMENT
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(12) A SUBSCRIPTION COORDINATOR OR SUBSCRIBER ORGANIZATION
DESIGNATED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL PAY AN
ACQUISITION FEE OF $50 TO THE OFFICE OR THE LOCAL ADMINISTERING AGENCY
FOR EACH DESIGNATED LMI CUSTOMER ENROLLED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(13) THE OFFICE OR A LOCAL ADMINISTERING AGENCY MAY
CONTRACT WITH A SUBSCRIPTION COORDINATOR OR SUBSCRIBER ORGANIZATION
TO CARRY OUT THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(P) (1) A COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM MAY
DEDICATE 8% OF THE KILOWATT–HOUR OUTPUT OF THE COMMUNITY SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM FOR FREE APPLICATION BY THE OFFICE OR THE
MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION TO ELIGIBLE HOUSEHOLDS THAT ARE:
(I) IDENTIFIED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION FOR
ENROLLMENT IN THE PROGRAM; AND
(II) 1. LOW–INCOME;
2. MODERATE–INCOME; OR
3. LOCATED IN A CENSUS TRACT THAT IS:
A. AN OVERBURDENED COMMUNITY; AND
B. AN UNDERSERVED COMMUNITY.
(2) THE OFFICE OR THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION
SHALL:
(I) IDENTIFY ELIGIBLE HOUSEHOLDS FOR ENROLLMENT IN
THE PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) ALLOCATE A DEDICATED BLOCK OF CAPACITY AMONG
ELIGIBLE HOUSEHOLDS IDENTIFIED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.

HOUSE BILL 1195 25
(3) AN ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL APPLY THE BILL CREDITS
ASSOCIATED WITH THE DEDICATED BLOCK OF CAPACITY TO ELIGIBLE HOUSEHOLDS
BASED ON ALLOCATION INSTRUCTIONS PROVIDED BY THE OFFICE, THE MARYLAND
ENERGY ADMINISTRATION, OR THE SUBSCRIPTION COORDINATOR OR SUBSCRIBER
ORGANIZATION DESIGNATED UNDER PARAGRAPH (7) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(4) THE OFFICE MAY REALLOCATE CAPACITY BLOCK AMOUNTS
DURING THE YEAR TO ACCOUNT FOR CHANGES IN HOUSEHOLD STATUS, ACCOUNT
CLOSURES, RELOCATIONS, OR OTHER EVENTS, IN ACCORDANCE WITH COMMISSION
REGULATIONS.
(5) AN ELIGIBLE HOUSEHOLD MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO EXECUTE A
SUBSCRIBER AGREEMENT OR CONTRACT DISCLOSURE FORM FOR AN ENROLLMENT
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(6) A SUBSCRIPTION COORDINATOR OR SUBSCRIBER ORGANIZATION
MAY CONTINUE TO ENROLL OTHER SUBSCRIBERS FOR THE PORTION OF THE
COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM’S OUTPUT NOT DEDICATED TO
ELIGIBLE HOUSEHOLDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(7) THE OFFICE OR THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION MAY
CONTRACT WITH A SUBSCRIPTION COORDINATOR OR SUBSCRIBER ORGANIZATION
TO CARRY OUT THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.